North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 10. Retail Activity.
§ 18B-1001.
Kinds of ABC permits; places eligible.

When the issuance of the permit is lawful in the jurisdiction in which the premises are located, the Commission may issue the following kinds of permits:

On-Premises Malt Beverage Permit. — An on-premises malt beverage permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of malt beverages for consumption on the premises, (ii) the retail sale of malt beverages in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises, and (iii) the retail sale of malt beverages in a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the container was filled or refilled. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer malt beverages, not more than four times per calendar year, to another on-premises malt beverage permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of malt beverages by on-premises malt beverage permittees, purchases of malt beverages by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sales of malt beverages by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of malt beverages may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the brewery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. It also authorizes the holder of the permit to ship malt beverages in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Eating establishments.

Food businesses.

Retail businesses.

Private clubs.

Convention centers.

Community theatres.

Breweries as authorized by subdivisions (7) and (8) of

G.S. 18B-1104(a)

.

Sports and entertainment venues.

Private bars.

The holder of a distillery permit authorized under

G.S. 18B-1105

.

Off-Premises Malt Beverage Permit. — An off-premises malt beverage permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of malt beverages in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises, (ii) the retail sale of malt beverages in a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the container was filled or refilled, and (iii) the holder of the permit to ship malt beverages in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer malt beverages, not more than four times per calendar year, to another off-premises malt beverage permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of malt beverages by off-premises malt beverage permittees, purchases of malt beverages by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sales of malt beverages by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of malt beverages may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the brewery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Eating establishments.

Food businesses.

Retail businesses.

The holder of a brewing, distillation, and fermentation course authorization under

G.S. 18B-1114.6

. A school obtaining a permit under this subdivision is authorized to sell malt beverages manufactured during its brewing, distillation, and fermentation program at one noncampus location in a county where the permittee holds and offers classes on a regular full-time basis in a facility owned by the permittee.

On-Premises Unfortified Wine Permit. — An on-premises unfortified wine permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of unfortified wine for consumption on the premises, either alone or mixed with other beverages, (ii) the retail sale of unfortified wine in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises, and (iii) the retail sale of unfortified wine dispensed from a tap connected to a pressurized container utilizing carbon dioxide or similar gas into a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the container was filled or refilled. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer unfortified wine, not more than four times per calendar year, to another on-premises unfortified wine permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of wine by on-premises unfortified wine permittees, purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the winery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The holder of the permit is authorized to ship unfortified wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. Orders received by a winery by telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not pursuant to this subdivision. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Eating establishments.

Private clubs.

Convention centers.

Cooking schools.

Community theatres.

Wineries.

Wine producers.

Retail businesses.

Sports and entertainment venues.

Private bars.

The holder of a distillery permit authorized under

G.S. 18B-1105

.

Off-Premises Unfortified Wine Permit. — An off-premises unfortified wine permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of unfortified wine in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises, (ii) the retail sale of unfortified wine dispensed from a tap connected to a pressurized container utilizing carbon dioxide or similar gas into a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the container was filled or refilled, and (iii) the holder of the permit to ship unfortified wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. The permit may be issued for retail businesses. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer unfortified wine, not more than four times per calendar year, to another off-premises unfortified wine permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of wine by off-premises unfortified wine permittees, purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the winery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The permit may also be issued to the holder of a viticulture/enology course authorization under

G.S. 18B-1114.4

. A school obtaining a permit under this subdivision is authorized to sell wines manufactured during its viticulture/enology program at one non-campus location in a county where the permittee holds and offers classes on a regular full-time basis in a facility owned by the permittee. The permit may also be issued for a winery or a wine producer for sale of its own unfortified wine during hours when the winery or wine producer’s premises is open to the public, subject to any local ordinance adopted pursuant to G.S. 18B-1004(d) concerning hours for the retail sale of unfortified wine. A winery obtaining a permit under this subdivision is authorized to sell wine manufactured by the winery at one additional location in the county under the same conditions specified in

G.S. 18B-1101(5)

for the sale of wine at the winery; provided, however, that no other alcohol sales shall be authorized at the additional location. Orders received by a winery by telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not pursuant to this subdivision.

On-Premises Fortified Wine Permit. — An on-premises fortified wine permit authorizes the retail sale of fortified wine for consumption on the premises, either alone or mixed with other beverages, and the retail sale of fortified wine in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer fortified wine, not more than four times per calendar year, to another on-premises fortified wine permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of wine by on-premises fortified wine permittees, purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the winery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred. The holder of the permit is authorized to ship fortified wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. Orders received by a winery by telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not pursuant to this subdivision. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Private clubs.

Community theatres.

Wineries.

Convention centers.

Private bars.

The holder of a distillery permit authorized under

G.S. 18B-1105

.

Sports and entertainment venues.

Off-Premises Fortified Wine Permit. — An off-premises fortified wine permit authorizes the retail sale of fortified wine in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises and it authorizes the holder of the permit to ship fortified wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. The permit may be issued for food businesses. The permit may also be issued for a winery for sale of its own fortified wine. Orders received by a winery by telephone, Internet, mail, facsimile, or other off-premises means of communication shall be shipped pursuant to a wine shipper permit and not pursuant to this subdivision. The permit also authorizes the permittee to transfer fortified wine, not more than four times per calendar year, to another off-premises fortified wine permittee that is under common ownership or control as the transferor. Except as authorized by this subdivision, transfers of wine by off-premises fortified wine permittees, purchases of wine by a retail permittee from another retail permittee for the purpose of resale, and sale of wine by a retail permittee to another retail permittee for the purpose of resale are unlawful. In addition, a particular brand of wine may be transferred only if both the transferor and transferee are located within the territory designated between the winery and the wholesaler on file with the Commission. Prior to or contemporaneous with any such transfer, the transferor shall notify each wholesaler who distributes the transferred product of the transfer. The notice shall be in writing or verifiable electronic format and shall identify the transferor and transferee, the date of the transfer, quantity, and items transferred.

Brown-Bagging Permit. — A brown-bagging permit authorizes each individual patron of an establishment, with the permission of the permittee, to bring up to eight liters of fortified wine or spirituous liquor, or eight liters of the two combined, onto the premises and to consume those alcoholic beverages on the premises. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Private clubs.

Community theatres.

Congressionally chartered veterans organizations.

Private bars.

Special Occasion Permit. — A special occasion permit authorizes the host of a reception, party or other special occasion, with the permission of the permittee, to bring fortified wine and spirituous liquor onto the premises of the business and to serve the same to his guests. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Eating establishments.

Private clubs.

Convention centers.

Private bars.

Sports and entertainment venues.

Limited Special Occasion Permit. — A limited special occasion permit authorizes the permittee to bring fortified wine and spirituous liquor onto the premises of a business, with the permission of the owner of that property, and to serve those alcoholic beverages to the permittee’s guests at a reception, party, or other special occasion being held there. The permit may be issued to any individual other than the owner or possessor of the premises. An applicant for a limited special occasion permit shall have the written permission of the owner or possessor of the property on which the special occasion is to be held.

Mixed Beverages Permit. — A mixed beverages permit authorizes the retail sale of mixed beverages for consumption on the premises. The permit also authorizes a mixed beverages permittee (i) to obtain a purchase-transportation permit under

G.S. 18B-403

and 18B-404, (ii) to obtain an antique spirituous liquor permit under subdivision (20) of this section, and (iii) to use for culinary purposes spirituous liquor lawfully purchased for use in mixed beverages. The permit may be issued for any of the following:

Restaurants.

Hotels.

Private clubs.

Convention centers.

Community theatres.

Nonprofit organizations.

Political organizations.

Sports and entertainment venues.

Private bars.

The holder of a distillery permit authorized under

G.S. 18B-1105

.

Culinary Permit. — A culinary permit authorizes a permittee to possess up to 12 liters of either fortified wine or spirituous liquor, or 12 liters of the two combined, in the kitchen of a business and to use those alcoholic beverages for culinary purposes. The permit may be issued for either of the following:

Restaurants;

Hotels;

Cooking schools.

A culinary permit may also be issued to a catering service to allow the possession of the amount of fortified wine and spirituous liquor stated above at the business location of that service and at the cooking site. The permit shall also authorize the caterer to transport those alcoholic beverages to and from the business location and the cooking site, and use them in cooking.

Mixed Beverages Catering Permit. — A mixed beverages catering permit authorizes a hotel or a restaurant that has a mixed beverages permit to bring spirituous liquor onto the premises where the hotel or restaurant is catering food for an event and to serve the liquor to guests at the event.

Guest Room Cabinet Permit. — A guest room cabinet permit authorizes a guest room cabinet permittee to sell to its room guests, from securely locked cabinets, malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, and spirituous liquor. A permittee shall designate and maintain at least ten percent (10%) of the permittee’s guest rooms as rooms that do not have a guest room cabinet. A permittee may dispense alcoholic beverages from a guest room cabinet only in accordance with written policies and procedures filed with and approved by the Commission. A permittee shall provide a reasonable number of vending machines, coolers, or similar machines on premises for the sale of soft drinks to hotel guests.A guest room cabinet permit may be issued to any of the following:

A hotel (i) holding a mixed beverages permit and (ii) located in a county subject to G.S. 18B-600(f).

A hotel (i) holding a mixed beverages permit and (ii) located in a county that has a population in excess of 150,000 by the last federal census.

A private club (i) holding a mixed beverages permit, (ii) having management contracts for the rental of living units, and (iii) located in a county defined in

G.S. 18B-101(13a)

b.2.

An 18-hole golf course (i) holding a mixed beverages permit or located in a county where ABC stores have heretofore been established but in which the sale of mixed beverages has not been approved, (ii) having management contracts for the rental of living units, and (iii) located in a county that has a population in excess of 20,000 people by the last federal census.

Brew on Premises Permit. — A permit may be issued to a business, located in a jurisdiction where the sale of malt beverages is allowed, where individual customers who are 21 years old or older may purchase ingredients and rent the equipment, time, and space to brew malt beverages for personal use in amounts set forth in 27 C.F.R. § 25.205. The customer must do all of the following:

Select a recipe and kettle.

Weigh out the proper ingredients and add them to the kettle.

Transfer the wort to the fermenter.

Add the yeast.

Place the ingredients in a fermentation room.

Filter, carbonate, and bottle the malt beverage.

A permittee may transfer the ingredients from the fermentation room to the cold room and may assist the customer in all the steps involved in brewing a malt beverage except adding the yeast. A malt beverage produced under this subdivision may not contain more than six percent (6%) alcohol by volume.

Wine-Tasting Permit. — A wine-tasting permit authorizes wine tastings on a premises holding a retail permit, by the retail permit holder or his employee. A wine tasting consists of the offering of a sample of one or more unfortified wine products, in amounts of no more than one ounce for each sample, without charge, to customers of the business. Any person pouring wine at a wine tasting shall be at least 21 years of age.

Representatives of the winery, which produced the wine, the wine producer, a wholesaler, or a wholesaler’s employee may assist with the tasting. Assisting with a wine tasting includes:

Pouring samples for customers.

Checking the identification of patrons being served at the wine tasting.

When a representative of the winery that produced the wine, the wine producer, a wine wholesaler, or a wine wholesaler’s employee assists in a wine tasting conducted by a retail permit holder:

The retail permit holder shall designate an employee to actively supervise the wine tasting.

A retail permit holder’s employee shall not supervise more than three wine-tasting areas.

No more than six wines may be tasted at any one tasting area.

The wine tasting shall not last longer than four hours from the time designated as the starting time by the retail permit holder.

The retail permit holder shall be solely liable for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the wine tasting. The Commission shall adopt rules to assure that the tastings are limited to samplings and not a subterfuge for the unlawful sale or distribution of wine, and that the tastings are not used by industry members for unlawful inducements to retail permit holders. Except for purposes of this subsection, the holder of a wine-tasting permit shall not be construed to hold a permit for the on-premises sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages. Any food business is eligible for a wine-tasting permit.

Wine Shop Permit. — A wine shop permit authorizes (i) the retail sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine in the manufacturer’s original container for consumption off the premises, (ii) the retail sale of malt beverages or unfortified wine dispensed from a tap connected to a pressurized container utilizing carbon dioxide or similar gas in a cleaned and sanitized container that is filled or refilled and sealed for consumption off the premises and that identifies the permittee and the date the container was filled or refilled, and (iii) wine tastings on the premises conducted and supervised by the permittee in accordance with subdivision (15) of this section. It also authorizes the holder of the permit to ship malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside the State. The permit may be issued for retail businesses whose primary purpose is selling malt beverages and wine for consumption off the premises and regularly and customarily educating consumers through tastings, classes, and seminars about the selection, serving, and storing of wine. The holder of the permit is authorized to sell unfortified wine for consumption on the premises, provided that the sale of wine for consumption on the premises does not exceed forty percent (40%) of the establishment’s total sales for any 30-day period. The holder of a wine-tasting permit not engaged in the preparation or sale of food on the premises is not subject to Part 6 of Article 8 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

Winemaking on Premises Permit. — A permit may be issued to a business, located in a jurisdiction where the sale of unfortified wine is allowed, where individual customers who are 21 years old or older may purchase ingredients and rent the equipment, time, and space to make unfortified wine for personal use in amounts set forth in 27 C.F.R. § 24.75. Except for wine produced for testing equipment or recipes and samples pursuant to this subdivision, the permit holder shall not engage in the actual production or manufacture of wine. Samples may be consumed on the premises only by a person who has a nonrefundable contract to ferment at the premises, and the samples may not exceed one ounce per sample. All wine produced at a winemaking on premises facility shall be removed from the premises by the customer and may only be used for home consumption and the personal use of the customer.

Malt Beverage Tasting Permit. — A malt beverage tasting permit authorizes malt beverage tastings on a premises holding a retail permit by the retail permit holder or his employee. A representative of the brewery whose beverages are being featured at the tasting shall be present at the tasting unless the wholesaler or a wholesaler’s employee determines that no representative of the brewery needs to be present. A malt beverage tasting consists of the offering of a sample of one or more malt beverage products, in amounts of no more than two ounces for each sample, without charge, to customers of the business. Any persons pouring malt beverage at a malt beverage tasting shall be at least 21 years of age.

Representatives of the brewery which produced the malt beverage, a wholesaler, or a wholesaler’s employee may assist with the tasting. Assisting with a malt beverage tasting includes:

Pouring samples for customers.

Checking the identification of patrons being served at the malt beverage tasting.

When a representative of the brewery that produced the malt beverage, a malt beverage wholesaler, or a malt beverage wholesaler’s employee assists in a malt beverage tasting conducted by a retail permit holder:

The retail permit holder shall designate an employee to actively supervise the malt beverage tasting.

A retail permit holder’s employee shall not supervise more than three malt beverage tasting areas.

No more than four malt beverages may be tasted at any one tasting area.

The malt beverage tasting shall not last longer than four hours from the time designated as the starting time by the retail permit holder.

The retail permit holder shall be solely liable for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the malt beverage tasting. The Commission shall adopt rules to assure that the tastings are limited to samplings and not a subterfuge for the unlawful sale or distribution of malt beverages, and that the tastings are not used by industry members for unlawful inducements to retail permit holders. Except for purposes of this subdivision, the holder of a malt beverage tasting permit shall not be construed to hold a permit for the on-premises sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages. Any food business is eligible for a malt beverage tasting permit.

Spirituous liquor tasting permit. — The holder of any distillery permit authorized by

G.S. 18B-1105

may conduct a consumer tasting event on the premises of the distillery subject to the following conditions:

Any person pouring spirituous liquor at a tasting shall be an employee of the distillery and at least 21 years of age.

The person pouring the spirituous liquor shall be responsible for checking the identification of patrons being served at the tasting.

Each consumer is limited to tasting samples of 0.25 ounce of each spirituous liquor which total no more than 1.5 ounces of spirituous liquor in any calendar day.

The consumer shall not be charged for any spirituous liquor tasting sample.

The spirituous liquor used in the consumer tasting event shall be distilled or produced at the distillery where the event is being held by the permit holder conducting the event.

A consumer tasting event shall not be allowed when the sale of spirituous liquor is otherwise prohibited.

Tasting samples are not to be offered to, or allowed to be consumed by, any person under the legal age for consuming spirituous liquor.

Consumer tasting events authorized under this subdivision may be conducted on any part of the licensed premises of the distillery, except as prohibited by federal law.

The distillery permit holder shall be solely liable for any violations of this Chapter occurring in connection with the tasting. The Commission shall adopt rules to assure that the tastings are limited to samplings and not a subterfuge for the unlawful sale or distribution of spirituous liquor and that the tastings are not used by industry members for unlawful inducements to retail permit holders.

Antique spirituous liquor permit. — A permit under this subdivision may be issued to a holder of a mixed beverages permit issued under subdivision (10) of this section. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the permit holder may sell at retail antique spirituous liquor for use in mixed beverages for consumption on premises. The acquisition of antique spirituous liquor on or after September 1, 2015, shall be in accordance with the process established by rule of the Commission for special orders of spirituous liquor that is not on the list approved by the Commission.

Common Area Entertainment Permit. — A permit under this subdivision may be issued to the owner or property owners’ association of a multi-tenant establishment that has at least two tenants that hold a permit issued under subdivision (1), (3), (5), or (10) of this section. A common area entertainment permit authorizes a customer of a multi-tenant establishment tenant holding a permit issued under subdivision (1), (3), (5), or (10) of this section to exit that licensed premises with an open container of the alcoholic beverage sold by the tenant holding the permit and consume the alcoholic beverage within the confines of any indoor or outdoor common area on the premises of the multi-tenant establishment designated by the owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment for consumption of alcoholic beverages. Additionally, a permit issued under this subdivision is subject to all of the following conditions:

The owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment shall designate the common area in which alcoholic beverages may be consumed. Additionally, the owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment shall post signs in conspicuous locations on the multi-tenant establishment property indicating which common area is the designated common area. The owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment shall submit to the Commission for review and approval (i) a plat of the multi-tenant establishment property for a designated outdoor common area with the common area designated for alcohol consumption clearly marked or (ii) a detailed map of the relevant building on the multi-tenant establishment property for a designated indoor common area with the common area designated for alcohol consumption clearly marked. The Commission shall reject any plat or map submitted under this sub-subdivision that does not meet the requirements of this subdivision or any rule adopted by the Commission. The owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment shall submit a plat or map as required under this sub-subdivision for each renewal of the permit issued under this subdivision and at least 10 days prior to making any adjustments to the designated common area.

Alcoholic beverages sold for consumption in a designated common area shall be dispensed only in a container that clearly identifies the licensed premises from which the beverage was purchased. The amount of alcoholic beverage dispensed into a container under this sub-subdivision shall not exceed 16 fluid ounces.

A customer is not allowed to possess or consume more than one alcoholic beverage at a time while within the designated common area.

Alcoholic beverages may only be consumed within the designated common area during the hours in which the alcoholic beverage may be sold under

G.S. 18B-1004

, and the owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment may further limit the days and times in which an alcoholic beverage may be consumed in a designated common area. The owner or property owners’ association of the multi-tenant establishment shall post signs in conspicuous locations on the multi-tenant establishment property indicating the days and times in which a person may consume an alcoholic beverage in a designated common area.

A customer in the designated common area shall dispose of any alcoholic beverage in his or her possession prior to exiting the designated common area unless the customer is entering a licensed premises that allows the customer to enter with the alcoholic beverage. A customer is not allowed to exit a designated common area with any alcoholic beverage he or she was consuming within the area except to enter a licensed premises that allows the customer to enter with the alcoholic beverage.

A customer is not allowed to bring and consume within the designated common area alcoholic beverages not purchased from a tenant of the multi-tenant establishment holding an applicable permit.

Any additional conditions imposed by the Commission. Any additional conditions imposed by the Commission shall be posted on the Commission’s Web site.

Airport Central Storage Permit. — A permit under this subdivision may be issued to the owner of a bonded storage warehouse that meets the federal Transportation Security Administration (TSA) security standards (49 C.F.R. §§ 1542.1 through 1542.307). This permit authorizes the permittee to contract with retail permittees holding permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001(1)

, (3), (5), and (10) with one or more retail locations at airports which service airplanes boarding at least 150,000 passengers annually to do the following: (i) store at a central receiving facility located on or within 5 miles of the airport property and outside the retail permittee’s licensed premises alcoholic beverages to be sold or served at the retail permittee’s airport locations as approved by the Commission and (ii) transport alcoholic beverages from the central receiving facility to the retail permittee’s premises or support locations within the airport terminal pursuant to subsections (d) and (e) of

G.S. 18B-1115

. Alcoholic beverages stored pursuant to this subdivision shall be the property of the retail permittee. The portion of the airport central storage permitted premises where the retail permittee’s alcoholic beverages are stored shall be deemed an extension of the retail permittee’s permitted premises for storage only and subject to inspection pursuant to

G.S. 18B-503

.

Common Carrier Vehicle Permit. — Notwithstanding the results of any local election, a permit under this subdivision may be issued to a business primarily engaged in this State in the intrastate operation of common carriers of passengers and operating under a certificate of authority issued by the North Carolina Utilities Commission. A common carrier vehicle permit authorizes the sale or service of malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, and mixed beverages in the passenger area of a common carrier of passengers for consumption by passengers in the passenger area during journeys of 75 miles or longer that do not terminate within 10 miles of the origin of the journey. The permit issued to the business shall cover all common carriers of passengers owned by the business. The permit or a copy of the permit shall be prominently displayed on each common carrier of passengers on which alcoholic beverages are served or sold. Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-101(12a), the passenger area of a permittee’s common carrier of passengers constitutes the premises for the permit. This permit shall not allow consumption of alcohol on a common carrier of passengers by any employee of the permittee. A permittee may not sell or serve alcoholic beverages to a passenger between the hours of 2:00 A.M. and 7:00 A.M., and a passenger may not be allowed to consume alcoholic beverages between the hours of 2:30 A.M. and 7:00 A.M. Notwithstanding G.S. 18B-1004(c) or any local ordinance, alcoholic beverages may not be sold or consumed before 10:00 A.M. on Sundays. For purposes of this subdivision, a common carrier of passengers has the same meaning as in

G.S. 20-4.01(27)

d.

History.

1945, c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, s. 1; 1957, cc. 1048, 1448; 1963, c. 426, ss. 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c, 586, s. 1; c. 654, ss. 1, 2; c. 722, s. 1; 1977, c. 70, s. 19; c. 182, s. 1; c. 669, ss. 1, 2; c. 676, ss. 1, 2; c. 911; 1979, c. 348, ss. 2, 3; c. 683, ss. 5, 6, 11, 12; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, ss. 16, 17, 22; 1983, c. 457, s. 3; c. 583, ss. 2-5; 1985, c. 89, ss. 1-3; c. 596, s. 1; 1987, c. 391, s. 2; c. 434, s. 1; 1989, c. 800, ss. 11, 12; 1991, c. 459, ss. 5, 6; c. 565, ss. 1, 7; c. 669, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 920, s. 7; 1993, c. 508, s. 5; 1995, c. 466, s. 10; c. 509, ss. 16-18; 1997-443, s. 16.28; 1997-467, s. 3; 2001-262, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 49(a); 2003-402, s. 5; 2005-350, ss. 1, 2(a); 2006-222, s. 2.1; 2006-227, ss. 1, 9; 2006-264, s. 35.3; 2009-377, s. 2; 2009-539, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 14.12(c); 2011-73, ss. 3, 4; 2011-107, s. 1; 2011-333, ss. 4, 5; 2013-76, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 28.2(a); 2014-120, s. 17(c); 2015-98, ss. 1(b), 1(d), 5(a), 8; 2017-87, ss. 5(a), 7, 16(d); 2018-100, s. 4(b); 2019-49, s. 6; 2019-182, ss. 1(a), 10, 19(b), 22; 2021-117, s. 12(b); 2021-150, ss. 9.2(a), 19.1, 28.1.